Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.025

Priority permitted for aged or ill parties in civil cases.

When setting civil cases for trial, unless otherwise provided by statute, upon motion of a party, the court may give priority to cases in which a party is frail and over seventy years of age, a party is afflicted with a terminal illness, or other good cause is shown for an expedited trial date.

[ 2003 c 406 s 2; 1991 c 197 s 1.]